District of Columbia statutes.
4-756.04

Interim eligibility reporting requirement.

The Department, no later than February 1 of each year, shall provide a report to the Council of the District of Columbia and the Interagency Council on Homelessness that shall include the following information:

(1)

Number of families placed in an interim eligibility placement;

(2)

Average length of stay in an interim eligibility placement;

(3)

Number of eligibility denials during and subsequent to an interim eligibility placement;

(4)

Number of appeals of eligibility determinations during and subsequent to an interim eligibility placement;

(5)

Number of interim eligibility appeals resolved via administrative review;

(6)

Average time for issuance of decision for review of interim eligibility appeal via administrative review;

(7)

Number of interim eligibility appeals brought to the Office of Administrative Hearings;

(8)

Average time for issuance of decision for review of interim eligibility appeal via the Office of Administrative Hearings; and

(9)

Final placement outcome for each family placed into an interim eligibility placement.

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 31b
as added Feb. 27, 2016, D.C. Law 21-75, § 2(h), 63 DCR 257
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(h) of the Interim Eligibility and Minimum Shelter Standards Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2016 (D.C. Act 21-326, Mar. 3, 2016, 63 DCR 3658).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 2(h) of the Interim Eligibility and Minimum Shelter Standards Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-217, Nov. 30, 2015, 62 DCR 15648).